Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-17,110
Loan; eligibility.

To qualify for a loan under the Nursing Faculty Student Loan Act, a student shall (1) be a resident of Nebraska, (2) be enrolled in a masters or doctoral accredited nursing program, and (3) agree in writing to engage in nursing instruction in an approved nursing program.

Laws 2005, LB 146, § 3.